California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
“Class of private railroad cars” means the Association of American Railroad’s, or successor organization’s, one letter alpha component of its car type codes as contained in that organization’s Exhibit D of the UMLER specification manual or successor exhibit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 220, Sec. 2.   Effective July 31, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Assessments [11251. - 11354.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11251. - 11254.]

11251.

Private railroad cars operated upon railroads into, out of, or through this state shall be assessed and taxed by the board as prescribed in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 220, Sec. 3.   Effective July 31, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11252.

The tax imposed in this part is in lieu of all other state, county, municipal, or district taxes, according to value, upon private railroad cars and their appurtenances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 220, Sec. 4.   Effective July 31, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11253.

(a) The board may, in its discretion, enter into a written installment payment agreement with a person for the payment of any taxes due, together with interest thereon and any applicable penalties, in installments over an agreed period. With mutual consent, the board and the taxpayer may alter or modify the agreement.

(b) Upon failure of a person to fully comply with the terms of an installment payment agreement with the board, the board may terminate the agreement by
 mailing a notice of termination to the person. The notice shall include an explanation of the basis for the termination and inform the person of his or her right to request an administrative review of the termination. Fifteen days after the mailing of the notice, the installment payment agreement shall be void, and the total amount of the tax, interest, and penalties due shall be immediately payable.

(c) The board shall establish procedures for an administrative review for persons requesting that review whose installment payment agreements are terminated under subdivision (b). The collection of taxes, interest, and penalties that are the subject of the terminated installment payment agreement may not be stayed during this administrative review process.

(d) The notice requirement in subdivision (b) shall not apply to any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in
 jeopardy.

Except in the case of fraud, if an installment payment agreement is entered into within 45 days from the due date of the tax bill, and the person complies with the terms of the installment payment agreement, the board shall relieve the penalty imposed pursuant to Section 11341.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 19.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11253.5.

The board, beginning no later than January 1, 2001, shall provide each taxpayer who has an installment payment agreement in effect under Section 11253 an annual statement setting forth the initial balance at the beginning of the year, the payments made during the year, and the remaining balance as of the end of the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11254.

Except in any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in jeopardy, if any property has been levied upon, the property or the proceeds from the sale of the property shall be returned to the taxpayer if the board determines any one of the following:

(a) The levy on the property was not in accordance with the law.

(b) The taxpayer has entered into and is in compliance with an installment payment agreement pursuant to
 Section 11253 to satisfy the tax liability for which the levy was imposed, unless that or another agreement allows for the levy.

(c) The return of the property will facilitate the collection of the tax liability or will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Reports [11271. - 11273.]

11271.

(a) Every person whose private railroad cars are operated upon the railroads in this state at any time during a calendar year shall file with the board on or before April 30 a report under oath setting forth specifically the information prescribed by the board to enable it to make the assessment required in this part.

(b) In the case of a corporate owner of property, the property statement shall be signed either by an officer of the corporation or by an employee or agent who has been designated in writing by the board of directors to sign such report on behalf of the
 corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1209.)
-------------------------------------------

11272.

The board for good cause may extend for not to exceed 30 days the time for making a report, provided a written request is filed with the board prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

11273.

If any person required to file a report fails to file it on or before April 30 or at the time as extended by the board, a penalty of 10 percent of the assessed value shall be added to the assessment.

If the assessee establishes to the satisfaction of the board that the failure to file the property statement timely was due to a reasonable cause and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the board shall order the penalty abated, provided the assessee has filed with
 the board written application for abatement of the penalty within the time prescribed by law for filing a petition for reassessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 199.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Valuations [11291. - 11294.]

11291.

The value of private railroad cars shall not include the car owner’s tools, shop equipment, materials, supplies, or other like items of personal property customarily kept or maintained at fixed locations for use in repairing, improving, servicing, or operating the cars.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 220, Sec. 5.   Effective July 31, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11292.

In making the assessment, the board shall value the cars by class based on the owner’s acquisition cost, less depreciation. The depreciation shall be computed for these enumerated Association of American Railroad’s, or successor organization’s, car type groups on a straight-line basis with the indicated depreciable life schedules with a maximum of 80 percent depreciation allowed.

(a) Stack cars (alpha S): 22 years minus the age at acquisition.

(b) Lightweight, low profile intermodal cars (alpha Q): 22 years minus the age at acquisition.

(c) Flat cars (alpha F): 22 years minus the age at acquisition.

(d) Conventional intermodal cars (alpha P): 22 years minus the age at acquisition.

(e) Vehicular flat cars (alpha V): 22 years minus the age at acquisition.

(f) All other cars (all other alphas): 25 years minus the age at acquisition.

(g) Betterments: the remaining depreciable life of the car to which the betterment is applied.

Acquisition cost is defined as the expenditures required to be capitalized by generally accepted accounting principles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 220, Sec. 6.   Effective July 31, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11293.

In making an assessment, the board shall determine the average number of each class of private railroad cars physically present in the state in the calendar year immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the tax is imposed upon the basis of car days. The board shall multiply the average number so determined by the value of a car of that class as determined under Section 11292 and use the product for the assessment of the cars.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 220, Sec. 7.   Effective July 31, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11294.

In determining the averages required in Section 11293, the board shall exclude from the California factor car mileage, car days or such other data which occurs while cars are not qualified for revenue service and are in a repair facility in this state requiring and undergoing or awaiting remodeling, overhaul, renovation, conversion or repair which necessitates total labor in excess of 10 man-hours.

Car days excluded pursuant to this section shall not exceed 90 days per car unless the claimant provides substantiation of the necessity for the additional days in such form as prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 388.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Estimated and Escaped Assessments [11311. - 11319.]

11311.

If any person neglects or refuses to make a report as required by Article 2 of this chapter, the board shall make an estimate of the matters required to enable the board to make the assessment. The estimate shall be made for the year in respect to which the person failed to make the report and shall be based upon any information available to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11312.

After making its estimate the board shall give to the person written notice of the estimate and its assessment. The notice shall be served personally or by mail; if by mail, service shall be made pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure and shall be addressed to the person at his address as it appears in the records of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11314.

If the board is dissatisfied with the report filed by any person, it may compute and determine the assessment upon the basis of any information available to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11315.

If any property required to be assessed for any year wholly escapes assessment or escapes assessment in part due to the board’s underassessing the property because of failure of the taxpayer to report the property accurately, the board shall immediately assess or reassess the property upon the discovery of the escape.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

11316.

If the board makes an assessment pursuant to Section 11311, 11314, or 11315 due to the negligence of the taxpayer, a penalty of 10 percent of the value of the estimated or escape assessment shall be added to the assessment. If the estimated or escape assessment is due to a fraudulent or willful attempt to evade the tax, a penalty of 25 percent of the value of the estimated or escape assessment shall be added to the assessment. A willful failure to file a report as required by Article 2 (commencing with Section 11271) of this chapter shall be deemed to be a
 willful attempt to evade the tax.

If the assessee establishes to the satisfaction of the board that the failure to file an accurate property statement was due to reasonable cause and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the board shall order the penalty abated, provided the assessee has filed with the board written application for abatement of the penalty within the time prescribed by law for filing a petition for reassessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 264, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11317.

(a) An escape assessment shall be entered on the current private railroad car tax record, and if this is not the record for the year in which the property escaped assessment, the entry shall be followed with “escape assessment for year 20__.” The property shall be assessed at the same value and taxed at the same rate as it would have been assessed and taxed had it not escaped.

(b) If the assessments are made as a result of an audit that discloses that property assessed to
 the party audited has been incorrectly assessed for a past tax year for which taxes have been paid and a claim for refund is not barred by Section 11553, the tax refunds, including applicable interest under Section 11555, resulting from the incorrect assessments shall be an offset against proposed tax liabilities, including accumulated penalties and interest, resulting from escaped assessments for any tax year covered by the audit. If the refunds exceed any proposed tax liabilities, including penalties and interest, the excess shall be processed in accordance with Section 11551.

(c) Beginning with the 1981–82 fiscal year, assessments for the current year and escape assessments for prior years shall be entered using a 100-percent assessment ratio and the tax rates for years prior to the 1981–82 fiscal year shall be divided by four.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 619.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11318.

Except in the case of a taxpayer fraudulently or willfully attempting to evade the tax, any escape assessment shall be made and the taxpayer notified thereof within four years after August 1 of the year in which the property escaped assessment. No escape assessment shall be effective until the assessee has been notified personally or by United States mail at his address as contained in the official records of the board. Receipt by the assessee of a tax bill based on such assessment shall suffice as such notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

11319.

If any assessment made pursuant to this article results in a tax that is paid after December 10 of the year to which the assessment relates, the tax shall bear interest at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521 from December 10 of the year in which the assessment should have been made to the date the assessment is added to the board roll; provided, however, that no addition shall be made whenever the escape was due to an error, other than an erroneous opinion of value, on the part of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reassessments [11336. - 11342.]

11336.

On or before August 1 the board shall complete the assessment of all property required to be assessed and shall notify the assessees thereof. This notice shall include an announcement of the statutory period during which, and the place at which, a petition for reassessment may be filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 264, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11337.

Between August 1 and August 21, the assessments made by the board shall be open for inspection by all persons interested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1132, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

11338.

(a) The owner or assessee may file a petition for reassessment on or before September 20. If the petition is not filed on or before September 20, or, if the period is extended by the board, by October 5, the assessment of the board shall be final.

(b) The board may extend the period for filing a petition until October 5 provided a written request for the extension is filed with the board on or before September 20.

(c) The board shall hear the applicant on such petition on or before January 31.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 407, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11339.

(a) Any assessment made outside of the regular assessment period may be the subject of a petition for reassessment. A petition for reassessment may be filed on or before the 50th day following the date of the notice of assessment.

(b) The board may extend the deadline for filing a petition for a period not to exceed 15 days, provided a written request for the extension is filed with the board on or before the expiration of the period for which the extension may be
 granted.

(c) If a petition for reassessment is not timely filed, the assessment of the board shall be final. The board may consider a petition which is not timely filed to be a claim for refund.

(d) The board shall hear the applicant on the petition within 90 days of the date on which the petition was filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 407, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11340.

Every petition for reassessment filed under Section 11338 or Section 11339 shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition shall include a statement of the petitioner’s opinion of value of the private railroad cars assessed.

Any petition that does not meet the requirements of this section shall be deemed invalid and shall not be acted upon by the board. A petition timely filed but deemed invalid may be amended or supplemented and refiled within such time as the board may prescribe; provided, however, that no amendment of a petition filed under Section
 11338 may be filed later than December 31.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1132, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

11341.

(a) The board shall render its decision on the petition for reassessment within 45 days of the date of the hearing on the petition, and shall mail notice of its decision to the applicant.

(b) If the board determines that the amount of the assessment should be increased, the notice shall advise the applicant of the amount of additional tax that is due, and the date by which payment must be made. If the additional tax is not paid within 15 days following the date on which notice is mailed, it is delinquent, and a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the additional
 tax shall be added thereto, plus interest on the amount of the additional tax at the rate of34 of 1 percent per month, or fraction thereof, from the date on which the additional tax became due until the date of payment.

(c) If the board determines that the amount of the assessment should be reduced, the notice shall advise the applicant of the amount of the tax that will be refunded or credited. The board shall proceed to refund or credit the overpayment in the manner prescribed in Section 11551, and interest shall be added to the credit or refund in the amount provided in Section 11555.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1132, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

11342.

A petitioner may request the board to close to the public a portion of the hearing by filing a declaration under penalty of perjury that evidence is to be presented which relates to trade secrets, the disclosure of which will be detrimental to the business interests of the owner of the trade secrets. If the board grants the request, only evidence relating to the trade secrets may be presented during the time the hearing is closed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 678, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Jeopardy Assessments [11351. - 11354.]

11351.

If at any time after the lien date the board believes that the collection of all or part of the tax imposed by this part will be jeopardized by delay, it shall immediately determine the assessed value of the property and the tax rate to be applied. From these it shall compute the amount of tax together with any interest and penalties. The amount so determined shall be due and payable upon service of a notice of assessment upon the person assessed and shall be final 10 days after service unless the person assessed within such 10-day period petitions for reassessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

11352.

The notice of assessment shall be inscribed “jeopardy assessment” and shall be served upon the assessee in the manner prescribed in Section 11312. It shall contain in addition to the information prescribed in Section 11404 notice that the tax, interest, and penalties are due and payable at the time of service and will be delinquent 10 days thereafter unless they are paid or a petition for reassessment is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

11353.

The person against whom a jeopardy assessment is made may file a petition for reassessment with the board within 10 days of service upon him of the notice of assessment. At the time of filing the petition the person shall deposit with the board such security as the board may deem necessary to insure payment of the amount due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

11354.

A jeopardy assessment is delinquent at the time it becomes final, and if unpaid at this time, a penalty of 10 percent of the tax shall be added thereto, plus interest on the amount of tax at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521 from the date on which the tax becomes due and payable until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Levy and Payment of Tax [11401. - 11409.]

11401.

On or before October 1, the board shall levy upon private railroad cars assessed under this part, for each year, a tax computed at the next preceding year’s average rate of general property taxation in the state and shall enter the tax upon a record maintained by the board for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1209.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.

The board shall compute the average rate of general property taxation in the state by:

(a) Adding the county, city, school district, and other general taxes, but not the special taxes on intangibles, aircraft, baled cotton or any other property which is subject to a uniform statewide tax rate, nor special assessments, and 

(b) Dividing the amount obtained by the total assessed valuation in the state as shown by the county tax rolls for the same year.

“Total assessed valuation,” as used in this section,
 does not include the assessments of property which is subject to a uniform statewide tax rate.

“Special assessments,” as used in this section, mean any amount levied solely against real estate or real estate and improvements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1209.)
-------------------------------------------

11404.

On or before October 15th in each year the board shall cause to be mailed to each person against whom a tax is levied a notice stating the amount of the assessment, the rate and amount of tax, and a demand that the tax be paid to the board not later than December 10th following.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 976.)
-------------------------------------------

11405.

If the tax is not paid on or before December 10th following the levy of the tax, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the tax shall be added thereto plus interest on the amount of the tax at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521 from December 10th until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11406.

Failure to pay the tax is not excused nor is any assessment or levy invalidated because of the failure of the board to send the notice prescribed by Section 11404, the sending of an erroneous notice, or the failure of the person whose property is assessed to receive the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11407.

If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the interest provided by Sections 11319, 11405, and 11430.

Any person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he bases his claim for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 947, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

11408.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the taxes imposed by this part and any penalty or interest added thereto.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the board finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to tax under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request.

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to tax, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to tax.

(3) The liability for taxes applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following:

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice to the person of the rescinded or modified advice.

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice.

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based.

(3) Any other information which the board may require.

(d) Only the person making the written request shall be entitled to rely on the board’s
 written advice to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 987, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------

11408.5.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A tax liability under this part was understated by a failure to pay a tax levied and required to be paid under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed, and the understatement of tax liability is attributable
 to one spouse; or any amount of the tax was unpaid and the nonpayment of the tax liability is attributable to one spouse. (2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment. (3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in tax attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other spouse shall be relieved of liability for tax (including interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the
 extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of tax.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar years subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar year that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination, five years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know” means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would
 have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to pay a levy or an omission of an item from the payment, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as a person that owns a private railroad car operated upon the railroads in this state to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as such a person, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for any unpaid tax or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board may relieve
 the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities arising prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section applicable retroactively as prescribed in subd. (h) and clarified in Sec. 60 of Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------

11409.

(a) The board, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part where the failure to pay tax is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the board acting in his or her official capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if the person filed a timely report and no significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a
 failure to act by, the taxpayer.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other information which the board may require.

(d) The board may grant relief only for interest imposed on tax liabilities that arise during taxable periods commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Corrections [11426. - 11430.]

11426.

When it can be determined by any report or from any papers of the board what was intended or what should have been assessed, defects in form or clerical errors of the board in assessing private railroad cars may be corrected by the board under this chapter at any time within four years after the assessment was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1209.)
-------------------------------------------

11427.

If the correction will increase the amount of tax due, the board shall give the assessee opportunity for a hearing after at least 10 days’ notice at which he may present his objections to the change. The board’s decision is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

11428.

The date and nature of the correction shall be entered in the records of the board and a statement of the correction of the assessment shall be mailed to the assessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 994.)
-------------------------------------------

11429.

If the amount of the tax is increased the additional tax shall be paid to the board on or before December 10th following the levy of the tax, or on or before the fifteenth day following the date of mailing the statement, whichever is the later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 994.)
-------------------------------------------

11430.

If the additional tax is not paid within the time specified in Section 11429, it is delinquent and a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the additional tax shall be added thereto, plus interest on the amount of the additional tax at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521 from the date on which the additional tax became due and payable until the time of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Collection of Tax [11451. - 11534.]



  ARTICLE 1. Security for Tax [11451. - 11453.]

11451.

(a) If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid by him or her or in the event a determination has been made against him or her which remains unpaid, the board may, not later than four years after the payment became delinquent, or within 10 years after the last recording of an abstract under Section 11495 or the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, give notice thereof personally or by first-class mail to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having in its
 possession or under its control any credits or other personal property belonging to the delinquent, or person against whom a determination has been made which remains unpaid, or owing any debts to the delinquent or that person. In the case of any state officer, department, or agency, the notice shall be given to the officer, department, or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent taxpayer to the Controller. After receiving the notice, the persons so notified shall neither transfer nor make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the board consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires earlier. All persons so notified shall forthwith, after receipt of the notice, advise the board of all the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them.

(b) If the notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or a state or federal savings and loan association or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank or a state or federal savings and loan association, the notice to be mailed shall state the amount, interest, and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of the bank or the state or federal savings and loan association at which the deposit is carried or at which the credits or personal property is held. A bank, a state or federal savings and loan association, or a state or federal credit union withholding any deposit or other credits or personal property required to be withheld in which the delinquent taxpayer and another person or persons have an interest, or held in the name of a third party or parties in which the delinquent taxpayer is ultimately determined to have no
 interest, is not liable therefor to any of the persons who have an interest in the deposit or other credits or personal property unless the deposit or other credits or personal property is released or transferred to the delinquent taxpayer.

(c) In the case of a deposit or other credits or personal property for which the transfer or other disposition is prevented, the depository institution required to prevent transfer or other disposition shall send a notice by first-class mail to each person named on a deposit, other credits, or personal property included in the notice from the board, provided a current address for each person is available to the depository institution. This notice shall inform each person as to the reason for preventing transfer or disposition of the deposit or other credits or personal property, the amount thereof which is prevented from transfer or other disposition, and the date by which that amount is to be remitted to
 the board. An institution may assess the deposit or other credits or personal property of each person receiving this notice a reasonable service charge not to exceed three dollars ($3).

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision, with respect to a deposit in a bank or a state or federal savings and loan association or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank or a state or federal savings and loan association, the aggregate amount of deposits, credits, or personal property to be withheld shall be an amount equal to two times the amount of the tax, interest, or penalty due from the person. If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid, he or she shall be liable to the state for any indebtedness
 due under this part from the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given if solely by reason of that transfer or disposition the state is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

11452.

(a) Subject to the limitations in subdivisions (b) and (c), the board may, by notice of levy, served personally or by first-class mail, require all persons having in their possession, or under their control, any credits or other personal property belonging to a person as defined in this part who is liable for any amount under this part to withhold from those credits or other personal property the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from that person, or the amount of any liability incurred by him or
 her under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the board at those times as it may designate.

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The amount of each payment due or becoming due to the person liable during the period of the levy.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “payments” does not include earnings, as defined in
 subdivision (a) of Section 706.001 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or funds in a deposit account, as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. “Payments” does include all of the following:

(1) Payments due for services for independent contractors, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, and mineral or other natural rights.

(2) Payments or credits due or becoming due periodically as a result of an enforceable obligation to the person liable for the tax.

(3) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due the person liable as the result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(e) In the case of a financial